Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.60.190

Certification of election results.

Ten days after a special election held in February or April, ten days after a presidential primary held pursuant to chapter 29A.56 RCW, fourteen days after a primary, or twenty-one days after a general election, the county canvassing board shall complete the canvass and certify the results. Each ballot that was returned before 8:00 p.m. on the day of the special election, general election, primary, or presidential primary, and each ballot bearing a postmark on or before the date of the special election, general election, primary, or presidential primary and received no later than the day before certification, must be included in the canvass report.

[ 2019 c 7 s 5; 2015 c 146 s 4. Prior: 2011 c 349 s 21; (2011 c 349 s 20 expired July 1, 2013); 2011 c 10 s 58; (2011 c 10 s 57 expired July 1, 2013); 2006 c 344 s 17; (2006 c 344 s 16 expired July 1, 2013); prior: 2005 c 243 s 16; (2005 c 153 s 12 expired July 1, 2013); 2004 c 266 s 18; 2003 c 111 s 1519.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 349 s 21: "Section 21 of this act takes effect July 1, 2013." [ 2011 c 349 s 31.]

Expiration date—2011 c 349 s 20: "Section 20 of this act expires July 1, 2013." [ 2011 c 349 s 32.]

Effective date—2011 c 349: See note following RCW 29A.04.255.

Effective date—2011 c 10 ss 53 and 58: See note following RCW 29A.60.160.

Expiration date—2011 c 10 ss 52 and 57: See note following RCW 29A.60.160.

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Effective date—2006 c 344 s 17: "Section 17 of this act takes effect July 1, 2013." [ 2006 c 344 s 43.]

Expiration date—2006 c 344 s 16: "Section 16 of this act expires July 1, 2013." [ 2006 c 344 s 42.]

Effective date—2006 c 344 ss 1-16 and 18-40: See note following RCW 29A.04.311.

Expiration date—2005 c 153 ss 11 and 12: See note following RCW 29A.60.160.

Effective date—2004 c 266: See note following RCW 29A.04.575.